Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Tax Expenditure Annual Report

§ 57-13-45.
Short title.

This section and Section 57-13-47 shall be known as the “Tax Expenditure Annual Report Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 380, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 57-13-47.
Preparation of reports.

For the purposes of this section the term “tax expenditure provision” means any statutory provision or state agency regulation which exempts, in whole or in part, any specific class or classes of persons, income, goods, services or property from the impact of established state taxes, including, but not limited to, those provisions known as tax deductions, tax allowances, tax exclusions, tax credits and tax exemptions.

The University Research Center shall annually prepare a report detailing the approximate costs in foregone revenue because of all state tax expenditure provisions, including those incorporated by conformance with the Federal Internal Revenue Code, in effect at the time of the report; however, the report to be submitted by November 1, 1986, may include tax expenditures only for sales taxes, use taxes and income taxes, and subsequent reports shall include tax expenditures for all taxes. The report shall also explain the policy purposes for each such tax expenditure provision and may show any indicators of effectiveness or ineffectiveness in achieving such policy purposes. If the Director of the University Research Center determines that preparation of such report shall adversely affect in a material manner any work or projects of the center which are being performed by staff persons preparing the report required by this section, the director may request the Legislative Budget Committee to reduce the requirements of this section as to the contents of the report for one (1) year, but in no event shall the report contain less than the dollar amount of each such tax expenditure required to be included therein.

The report shall include the analyses required by Sections 57-13-101 through 57-13-109.

The University Research Center shall, on or before November 1 of each year, furnish five (5) copies of the report to the Secretary of the Senate and to the Clerk of the House of Representatives, two (2) copies to the Senate Finance and Appropriations Committees and to the House Ways and Means and Appropriations Committees, and a copy to each member of the State Fiscal Management Board and the Legislative Budget Committee. Each member of the Legislature shall be entitled to receive one (1) copy of the report upon request.

All state agencies and all political subdivisions of the State of Mississippi, and the officers and employees thereof, shall cooperate with the center in preparing such report and shall provide any and all information, documents and materials requested by the center.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 380, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 55; Laws, 2014, ch. 517, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2014.